
DIAS1−01

DI−364
−DIAGNOSTICS VARIABLE GEAR RATIO STEERING

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
HINT:
If a malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit indicated by the DTC. For details
of each code, turn to the page for the respective ”DTC No.” in the DTC chart.
DTC chart of VGRS system:

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C1511/11
(DI−371)

Steering angle sensor malfunction

SSteeringanglesensor
SSteeringanglesensorcircuit
SVGRSECU
SSkidcontrolECU

C1515/15
(DI−380)

VGRS actuator neutral position is not initialized
SVGRSactuator
SVGRSECU

C1516/16
(DI−381)

VGRS actuator neutral position incomplete
SVGRSactuator
SVGRSECU

C1521/21
(DI−383)

C1522/22
(DI−385)

VGRS t t lf ti
SVGRSactuator

C1527/27
(DI−387)

VGRSactuatormalfunction
SVGRS actuator
SVGRSECU

C1528/28
(DI−387)

C1531/31
(DI−390)

C1532/32
(DI−391)

VGRS ECU malfunction SVGRSECU

C1533/33
(DI−392)

C1541/41
(DI−394)

Vehicle skid control system malfunction
SVSCsystem
SVGRSECU
SSkidcontrolECU

C1549/49
(DI−397)

Vehicleskidcontrol systemcommunicationmalfunction
SWireharnessandconnector
SVGRSECU
SSkidcontrolECU

C1551/51
(DI−401)

IG power source voltage malfunction

SECU−IGfuse
S IGcircuit
SChargingsystem
SVGRSECU

C1552/52
(DI−403)

DC motor power source voltage
SVGRSfuse
SPowersourcecircuit
SVGRSECU

C1554/54
(DI−405)

Power source relay failure
SVGRSfuse
SVGRSECU

C1555/55
(DI−407)

Predriver malfunction
SPowersourcecircuit
SVGRSECU

C1561/61
(DI−409)

Lock mechanism malfunction
SVGRSactuator
SVGRSECU

C1567/67
(DI−411)

Lock mechanism insertion malfunction
SVGRSactuator
SVGRS ECU
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C1568/68
(DI−413)

Lock holder deviation detection SVGRSactuator

C1569/69
(DI−415)

Lock mechanism release incomplete SVGRS actuator


